ro-RO: Caracteristici ale sistemului de călcat: Masă cu înălțime reglabilă; Lumină încorporată; Mânecar încorporat; Sistem de gestionare a cablului; Design pliabil; Cârlig pentru haine; Priză electrică integrată; Suport pentru fier de călcat; Masă rotativă; Suprafață de masă ventilată; Altele
ru: Особенности гладильного центра: Доска с регулируемой высотой; Встроенная подсветка; Встроенная подрукавная доска; Система укладки шнура; Раскладная конструкция; Крючок для одежды; Встроенная электрическая розетка; Подставка для утюга; Поворотная доска; Вентилируемая поверхность доски; Другое
zh-CN: 熨烫中心功能: 高度可调烫衣板; 内置灯; 内置袖板; 线缆管理系统; 折叠设计; 挂衣钩; 集成电源插座; 熨斗架; 旋转板; 通风板面; 其他
pl: Funkcje centrum prasowania: Deska z regulacją wysokości; Wbudowane światło; Wbudowany rękawnik; System zarządzania kablem; Składana konstrukcja; Haczyk na odzież; Zintegrowane gniazdko elektryczne; Podstawka pod żelazko; Obrotowa deska; Wentylowana powierzchnia deski; Inne
nl: Strijkstation functies: In hoogte verstelbare plank; Ingebouwde verlichting; Ingebouwd mouwplankje; Kabelmanagementsysteem; Uitklapbaar ontwerp; Kledinghaak; Geïntegreerd stopcontact; Strijkijzerhouder; Draaibare plank; Geventileerd plankoppervlak; Overig
it: Caratteristiche del centro stiro: Asse da stiro ad altezza regolabile; Luce integrata; Stiramaniche integrato; Sistema di gestione del cavo; Design a scomparsa; Gancio per indumenti; Presa elettrica integrata; Poggiaferro; Asse da stiro girevole; Superficie asse ventilata; Altro
zh-TW: 熨燙中心功能: 高度可調燙衣板; 內建照明; 內建袖板; 電線收納系統; 展開式設計; 衣物掛鉤; 內建電源插座; 熨斗架; 旋轉燙衣板; 通風板面; 其他
es: Características del centro de planchado: Tabla de altura ajustable; Luz integrada; Tabla para mangas integrada; Sistema de gestión de cables; Diseño plegable; Gancho para ropa; Toma de corriente integrada; Soporte para plancha; Tabla giratoria; Superficie de la tabla ventilada; Otra
da: Strygecenterets funktioner: Bræt med justerbar højde; Indbygget lys; Indbygget ærmebræt; Ledningsstyringssystem; Udklappeligt design; Tøjkrog; Integreret stikkontakt; Strygejernsholder; Drejeligt bræt; Ventileret brætoverflade; Andet
th: สิ่งอำนวยความสะดวกสำหรับรีดผ้า: โต๊ะรีดผ้าปรับความสูงได้; ไฟในตัว; โต๊ะรองรีดแขนเสื้อในตัว; ระบบจัดการสายไฟ; ดีไซน์แบบพับออก; ตะขอแขวนผ้า; เต้ารับไฟฟ้าในตัว; ที่วางเตารีด; โต๊ะรีดผ้าแบบหมุนได้; พื้นผิวโต๊ะรีดผ้าระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
fr: Caractéristiques de la centrale de repassage: Planche à hauteur réglable; Lumière intégrée; Jeannette intégrée; Système de gestion des câbles; Conception dépliante; Crochet pour vêtements; Prise électrique intégrée; Repose-fer; Planche pivotante; Surface de planche ventilée; Autre
hr-HR: Značajke centra za glačanje: Daska podesive visine; Ugrađeno svjetlo; Ugrađena daska za rukave; Sustav za upravljanje kabelima; Sklopivi dizajn; Kuka za odjeću; Ugrađena električna utičnica; Stalak za glačalo; Okretna daska; Ventilirana površina daske; Ostalo
cs: Funkce žehlicího centra: Výškově nastavitelné prkno; Zabudované světlo; Zabudovaný rukávník; Systém pro vedení kabelu; Výklopný design; Háček na oděvy; Integrovaná elektrická zásuvka; Odkládací plocha na žehličku; Otočné prkno; Odvětrávaný povrch prkna; Jiné
pt-PT: Características do centro de engomar: Tábua com altura ajustável; Luz integrada; Tábua para mangas integrada; Sistema de gestão de cabos; Design dobrável; Gancho para roupa; Tomada elétrica integrada; Descanso para ferro; Tábua giratória; Superfície de tábua ventilada; Outro
pt-BR: Centro de passar roupa recursos: Tábua com altura ajustável; Luz embutida; Tábua para mangas embutida; Sistema de gerenciamento de cabos; Design dobrável; Gancho para roupas; Tomada elétrica integrada; Apoio para ferro; Tábua giratória; Superfície da tábua ventilada; Outras
sv: Funktioner i strykcentret: Höj- och sänkbar bräda; Inbyggd belysning; Inbyggd ärmbräda; Sladdhanteringssystem; Utfällbar design; Klädkrok; Inbyggt eluttag; Strykjärnsställ; Svängbar bräda; Ventilerad strykbrädsyta; Annat
de: Funktionen der Bügelstation: Höhenverstellbares Brett; Eingebautes Licht; Eingebautes Ärmelbrett; Kabelmanagement-System; Ausklappbares Design; Kleiderhaken; Integrierte Steckdose; Bügeleisenablage; Schwenkbares Brett; Belüftete Brettfläche; Sonstige
vi: Các tính năng của trung tâm ủi: Bàn ủi có thể điều chỉnh độ cao; Đèn tích hợp; Bàn ủi tay áo tích hợp; Hệ thống quản lý dây điện; Thiết kế gập; Móc treo quần áo; Ổ cắm điện tích hợp; Giá để bàn ủi; Bàn xoay; Mặt bàn ủi thông gió; Khác
hu: Vasalóállomás jellemzői: Állítható magasságú deszka; Beépített világítás; Beépített ujjafa; Kábelrendező rendszer; Kihajtható kialakítás; Ruhaakasztó; Beépített hálózati aljzat; Vasalótartó; Forgatható deszka; Szellőző deszkafelület; Egyéb
bg-BG: Характеристики на центъра за гладене: Дъска с регулируема височина; Вградено осветление; Вградена дъска за ръкави; Система за управление на кабелите; Разгъващ се дизайн; Кука за дрехи; Вграден електрически контакт; Поставка за ютия; Въртяща се дъска; Вентилирана повърхност на дъската; Други
tr: Ütüleme merkezi özellikleri: Yüksekliği ayarlanabilir masa; Dahili ışık; Dahili kol masası; Kablo yönetim sistemi; Katlanır tasarım; Giysi askısı; Entegre elektrik prizi; Ütü koyma yeri; Dönebilen masa; Havalandırmalı masa yüzeyi; Diğer
ko: 다리미 센터 기능: 높이 조절식 보드; 빌트인 조명; 빌트인 소매 보드; 코드 정리 시스템; 접이식 디자인; 의류용 후크; 내장형 전기 콘센트; 다리미 받침대; 회전 보드; 통풍형 보드 표면; 기타
sl-SI: Lastnosti likalne postaje: Deska z nastavljivo višino; Vgrajena luč; Vgrajena deska za rokave; Sistem za upravljanje kablov; Zložljiva oblika; Kavelj za oblačila; Vgrajena električna vtičnica; Odlagališče za likalnik; Vrtljiva deska; Zračna površina deske; Drugo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά συστήματος σιδερώματος: Σιδερώστρα ρυθμιζόμενου ύψους; Ενσωματωμένο φως; Ενσωματωμένη σιδερώστρα μανικιών; Σύστημα διαχείρισης καλωδίου; Αναδιπλούμενος σχεδιασμός; Γάντζος ρούχων; Ενσωματωμένη πρίζα; Βάση σίδερου; Περιστρεφόμενη σιδερώστρα; Αεριζόμενη επιφάνεια σιδερώστρας; Άλλο
en: Ironing center features: Adjustable height board; Built-in light; Built-in sleeve board; Cord management system; Fold-out design; Garment hook; Integrated electrical outlet; Iron rest; Swivel board; Ventilated board surface; Other
fi: Silitystarvikkeiden säilytystilan ominaisuudet: Korkeussäädettävä lauta; Sisäänrakennettu valo; Sisäänrakennettu hihalauta; Johdonhallintajärjestelmä; Avattava malli; Vaatekoukku; Integroitu pistorasia; Silitysraudan teline; Kääntyvä lauta; Ilmastoitu laudan pinta; Muu
ja: アイロン台機能: 高さ調整可能なボード; 組み込みライト; 組み込みスリーブボード; コード管理システム; 折りたたみ式デザイン; ガーメントフック; 組み込みコンセント; アイロン置き; 回転ボード; 通気性のあるボード表面; その他
lt-LT: Lyginimo centro savybės: Reguliuojamo aukščio lenta; Įmontuotas apšvietimas; Įmontuota rankovių lenta; Laidų tvarkymo sistema; Atlenkiamas dizainas; Drabužių kablys; Integruotas elektros lizdas; Lygintuvo laikiklis; Pasukama lenta; Vėdinamas lentos paviršius; Kita
sk-SK: Vlastnosti žehliaceho centra: Doska s nastaviteľnou výškou; Vstavané svetlo; Vstavaný rukávnik; Systém na správu káblov; Skladací dizajn; Háčik na odev; Integrovaná elektrická zásuvka; Odkladacia plocha na žehličku; Otočná doska; Vetraný povrch dosky; Iné
nb: Funksjoner på strykesenteret: Høydejusterbart brett; Innebygd lys; Innebygd ermebrett; Kabelhåndteringssystem; Utbrettbart design; Kleskrok; Integrert stikkontakt; Strykejernsstøtte; Svingbart brett; Ventilert brettoverflate; Annet